Massachusetts, session 194th, H2304.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 40 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following
section:
Section 13F - Regional School Assessment Reserve Fund for payments towards future
Regional Assessments
Any municipality which accepts this section by a majority vote of the municipality’s
legislative body may establish and appropriate or transfer money to a reserve fund to be utilized
in the upcoming fiscal years, to pay for the Regional Assessment in years when the Regional
Assessment increases by more than 3.5% over the previous year’s Regional Assessment. The
balance in the reserve fund shall not exceed 10 percent of the annual Regional Assessment for
the municipality.
of 2

Funds shall only be distributed from the reserve funds after a majority vote of the
municipality’s legislative body in years when the Regional Assessment is more than 3.5% in
order to bring the Regional Assessment down to no less than 2.5% increase.
The municipal treasurer may invest the monies in the manner authorized in section 54 of
chapter 44 and any interest earned thereon shall be credited to and become part of the fund.
of 2